Nebraska, session 109, LB859.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section, county conflict
counsel means an attorney licensed to practice law in this state who is
employed by the county or has a contract with the county to provide legal
representation to clients who would normally be represented by the public
defender, but for whom the public defender is unable to provide such
representation due to conflicting interests or due to other good cause as
determined by the court.
(2) In any county with a public defender, the county may employ or
contract for one or more county conflict counsel. When a county first
employs or contracts for county conflict counsel, the county board shall
immediately provide written notice of such employment or contract to:
(a) Each presiding judge of the county court and district court of
such county;
(b) Each presiding judge of any separate juvenile court of such
county;
(c) Each child support referee appointed in such county; and
(d) The clerk of the district court on behalf of the mental health
board with jurisdiction within such county.
(3) It shall be the duty of county conflict counsel to provide
representation to indigent individuals in the same manner as the public
defender.
(4) In a county with a population of more than one hundred seventy
thousand inhabitants, any county conflict counsel shall devote his or her
full time to the legal work of representing indigent individuals as
provided in this section and shall not engage in the private practice of
law.
(5) No county conflict counsel shall solicit or accept any fee,
other than compensation from the county, for representing an indigent
individual that such counsel has been appointed to represent.
Sec. 2. Section 29-3901, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
-2-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
29-3901 For purposes of sections 29-3901 to 29-3908:
(1) County conflict counsel has the same meaning as in section 1 of
this act;
(2) (1) Court means shall mean a district court or a county court;
(3) (2) Felony defendant means shall mean a person who is charged by
complaint, information, or indictment with or who is under arrest for
investigation or on suspicion that he or she may have committed any
criminal offense which may be punishable by imprisonment in a Department
of Correctional Services adult correctional facility;
(4) (3) Indigent means shall mean the inability to retain legal
counsel without prejudicing one's financial ability to provide economic
necessities for one's self or one's family. Before a felony defendant's
initial court appearance, the determination of his or her indigency shall
be made by the public defender, but thereafter it shall be made by the
court; and
(5) (4) Judge means shall mean a judge of the district court, a
judge of the county court, or a clerk magistrate.
Sec. 3. Section 29-3903, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-3903 (1) At a felony defendant's first appearance before a judge,
the judge shall advise him or her of the right to court-appointed counsel
if such person is indigent. If he or she asserts indigency, the court
shall make a reasonable inquiry to determine such person's financial
condition and shall require him or her to execute an affidavit of
indigency for filing with the clerk of the court.
(2) If the court determines the defendant to be indigent, it shall
formally appoint the public defender or, in counties not having a public
defender, an attorney or attorneys licensed to practice law in this
state, not exceeding two, to represent the indigent felony defendant at
all future critical stages of the criminal proceedings against such
defendant, consistent with the provisions of section 23-3402. Appointed ,
-3-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
but appointed counsel other than the public defender or county conflict
counsel must obtain leave of court before being authorized to proceed
beyond an initial direct appeal to either the Court of Appeals or the
Supreme Court of Nebraska to any further direct, collateral, or
postconviction appeals to state or federal courts.
(3) A felony defendant who is not indigent at the time of his or her
first appearance before a judge may nevertheless assert his or her
indigency at any subsequent stage of felony proceedings, at which time
the judge shall consider appointing counsel as otherwise provided in this
section.
(4) The judge, upon filing such order for appointment, shall note
all appearances of appointed counsel upon the record. If at the time of
appointment of counsel the indigent felony defendant and appointed
counsel have not had a reasonable opportunity to consult concerning the
prosecution, the judge shall continue the arraignment, trial, or other
next stage of the felony proceedings for a reasonable period of time to
allow for such consultation.
Sec. 4. Section 29-3904, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-3904 (1) Nothing in sections 23-3402, 29-3902, and 29-3903 shall
prevent any judge from:
(a) Appointing appointing counsel other than the public defender,
county conflict counsel, or other substitute counsel when the public
defender, county conflict counsel, or counsel initially appointed might
otherwise be required to represent conflicting interests or for other
good cause shown; ,
(b) Not from not appointing any counsel for any indigent felony
defendant who expressly waives his or her right to such counsel at any
stage of felony proceedings; , or
(c) Appointing from appointing the public defender, county conflict
counsel, or other counsel as may be required or permitted by other
-4-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
applicable law.
(2)(a) This subsection only applies to a county that has county
conflict counsel.
(b) When appointing counsel other than the public defender to
represent an indigent defendant, the court shall appoint county conflict
counsel, unless such counsel cannot represent the defendant due to
conflicting interests or for other good cause shown.
(3) (2) In selecting counsel to represent an indigent felony
defendant, the prosecuting attorney shall not have any role whatsoever in
the selection or appointment process of the counsel by the court,
including, but not limited to, any individual appointment suggestions.
Sec. 5. Section 29-3905, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-3905 Appointed counsel for an indigent felony defendant other
than the public defender or county conflict counsel shall apply to the
district court which appointed him or her for all expenses reasonably
necessary to permit him or her to effectively and competently represent
his or her client and for fees for services performed pursuant to such
appointment, except that if the defendant was not bound over for trial in
the district court, the application shall be made in the appointing
court. The court, upon hearing the application, shall fix reasonable
expenses and fees, and the county board shall allow payment to counsel in
the full amount determined by the court.
Sec. 6. Section 29-3918, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-3918 Nothing in sections 29-3910 to 29-3918 shall prevent a court
from appointing counsel other than the public defender or county conflict
counsel as defined in section 1 of this act to represent indigent
defendants or other persons by law entitled to legal representation, but
appointments of counsel other than the public defender or county conflict
counsel shall be limited to situations in which there are multiple
-5-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
defendants requiring separate representation or when other exigent
circumstances are present which in the opinion of the court require
appointment of counsel other than the public defender or county conflict
counsel. In all such cases of appointments of counsel other than the
public defender or county conflict counsel, the procedure shall be in
accordance with sections 43-272 and 43-273 and the cost of such
appointments shall be paid by the county as provided in such sections.
Sec. 7. Section 29-3922, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-3922 For purposes of the County Revenue Assistance Act:
(1) Chief counsel means an attorney appointed to be the primary
administrative officer of the commission pursuant to section 29-3928;
(2) Commission means the Commission on Public Advocacy;
(3) Commission staff means attorneys, investigators, and support
staff who are performing work for the capital litigation division,
appellate division, DNA testing division, and major case resource center;
(4) Contracting attorney means an attorney contracting to act as a
public defender pursuant to sections 23-3404 to 23-3408;
(5) Court-appointed attorney means an attorney other than a
contracting attorney or a public defender appointed by the court to
represent an indigent person;
(6) Indigent defense services means legal services provided to
indigent persons by an indigent defense system in capital cases, felony
cases, misdemeanor cases, juvenile cases, mental health commitment cases,
child support enforcement cases, and paternity establishment cases;
(7) Indigent defense system means a system of providing services,
including any services necessary for litigating a case, by a contracting
attorney, court-appointed attorney, or public defender;
(8) Indigent person means a person who is indigent and unable to
obtain legal counsel as determined pursuant to subdivision (4) (3) of
section 29-3901; and
-6-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
(9) Public defender means an attorney appointed or elected pursuant
to sections 23-3401 to 23-3403.
Sec. 8. Section 43-272, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
43-272 (1)(a) In counties having a population of less than one
hundred fifty thousand inhabitants:
(i) When any juvenile court petition is filed alleging jurisdiction
of a juvenile pursuant to subdivision (2) of section 43-247, counsel
shall be appointed for such juvenile; and
(ii) In any other instance in which a juvenile is brought without
counsel before a juvenile court, the court shall advise such juvenile and
his or her parent or guardian of their right to retain counsel and shall
inquire of such juvenile and his or her parent or guardian as to whether
they desire to retain counsel.
(b) In counties having a population of one hundred fifty thousand or
more inhabitants, when any juvenile court petition is filed alleging
jurisdiction of a juvenile pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), (3)(b), or
(4) of section 43-247, counsel shall be appointed for such juvenile.
(c) The court shall inform any juvenile described in this subsection
and his or her parent or guardian of such juvenile's right to counsel at
county expense if none of them is able to afford counsel. If the juvenile
or his or her parent or guardian desires to have counsel appointed for
such juvenile, or the parent or guardian of such juvenile cannot be
located, and the court ascertains that none of such persons are able to
afford an attorney, the court shall forthwith appoint an attorney to
represent such juvenile for all proceedings before the juvenile court,
except that if an attorney is appointed to represent such juvenile and
the court later determines that a parent of such juvenile is able to
afford an attorney, the court shall order such parent or juvenile to pay
for services of the attorney to be collected in the same manner as
provided by section 43-290. If the parent willfully refuses to pay any
-7-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
such sum, the court may commit him or her for contempt, and execution may
issue at the request of the appointed attorney or the county attorney or
by the court without a request.
(d)(i) For purposes of this subdivision, county conflict counsel has
the same meaning as in section 1 of this act.
(ii) This subdivision (d) only applies to a county that has county
conflict counsel.
(iii) When appointing counsel other than the public defender to
represent a juvenile, the court shall appoint county conflict counsel,
unless such counsel cannot represent the juvenile due to conflicting
interests or for other good cause shown.
(2) The court, on its own motion or upon application of a party to
the proceedings, shall appoint a guardian ad litem for the juvenile: (a)
If the juvenile has no parent or guardian of his or her person or if the
parent or guardian of the juvenile cannot be located or cannot be brought
before the court; (b) if the parent or guardian of the juvenile is
excused from participation in all or any part of the proceedings; (c) if
the parent is a juvenile or an incompetent; (d) if the parent is
indifferent to the interests of the juvenile; or (e) in any proceeding
pursuant to the provisions of subdivision (3)(a) of section 43-247.
A guardian ad litem shall have the duty to protect the interests of
the juvenile for whom he or she has been appointed guardian, and shall be
deemed a parent of the juvenile as to those proceedings with respect to
which his or her guardianship extends.
(3) The court shall appoint an attorney as guardian ad litem. A
guardian ad litem shall act as his or her own counsel and as counsel for
the juvenile, unless there are special reasons in a particular case why
the guardian ad litem or the juvenile or both should have separate
counsel. In such cases the guardian ad litem shall have the right to
counsel, except that the guardian ad litem shall be entitled to appointed
counsel without regard to his or her financial ability to retain counsel.
-8-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
Whether such appointed counsel shall be provided at the cost of the
county shall be determined as provided in subsection (1) of this section.
(4) By July 1, 2015, the Supreme Court shall provide by court rule
standards for guardians ad litem for juveniles in juvenile court
proceedings.
(5) By July 1, 2017, the Supreme Court shall provide guidelines
setting forth standards for all attorneys who practice in juvenile court.
Sec. 9. Section 43-273, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
43-273 (1) Counsel and guardians ad litem appointed outside of the
guardian ad litem division as provided in section 43-272 shall apply to
the court before which the proceedings were had for fees for services
performed. The court upon hearing the application shall fix reasonable
fees. The county board of the county wherein the proceedings were had
shall allow the account, bill, or claim presented by any attorney or
guardian ad litem for services performed under section 43-272 in the
amount determined by the court. No such account, bill, or claim shall be
allowed by the county board until the amount thereof shall have been
determined by the court.
(2) This section does not apply to the public defender or to county
conflict counsel as defined in section 1 of this act.
Sec. 10. Section 71-946, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-946 (1) The appointment of counsel under section 71-945 shall be
in accordance with this section. the following procedures:
(2) In (1) Except in counties not having a public defender, upon the
receipt from the mental health board of a certificate for the appointment
of counsel, the clerk of the district court shall notify the district
judge or the county judge of the county in which the proceedings are
pending of the receipt of such certificate. The judge to whom the
certificate was issued shall appoint an attorney to represent the person
-9-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
concerning whom an application is filed before the mental health board,
whereupon the clerk of the court shall enter upon the certificate the
name of the attorney appointed and deliver the certificate of appointment
of counsel to the mental health board. The clerk of the district court or
the clerk of the county court shall also keep and maintain a record of
all appointments which shall be conclusive evidence thereof. All
appointments of counsel under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act
or the Sex Offender Commitment Act may be made at any time or place in
the state. ; and
(3) (2) In counties having a public defender, upon receipt from the
mental health board of a certificate for the appointment of counsel, the
clerk of the district court shall notify the public defender of his or
her appointment to represent the person and shall enter upon the
certificate the name of the attorney appointed and deliver the
certificate of appointment of counsel to the mental health board.
(4)(a) For purposes of this section, county conflict counsel has the
same meaning as in section 1 of this act.
(b) This subsection only applies to a county that has county
conflict counsel.
(c) When appointing counsel other than the public defender to
represent a subject, the court shall appoint county conflict counsel,
unless such counsel cannot represent the subject due to conflicting
interests or for other good cause shown.
Sec. 11. Section 71-947, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-947 Counsel appointed as provided in subsection (2) subdivision
(1) of section 71-946 shall apply to the court in which his or her
appointment is recorded for fees for services performed. Such counsel may
also apply to the court to secure separate professional examination of
the person for whom counsel was appointed and shall be reimbursed for
costs incurred in securing such separate examination or examinations or
-10-

LB859 LB859
2026 2026
in having other professional persons as witnesses before the mental
health board. The court, upon hearing the application, shall fix
reasonable fees, including reimbursement of costs incurred. The county
board of the county in which the application was filed shall allow the
account, bill, or claim presented by the attorney for services performed
under the Nebraska Mental Health Commitment Act or the Sex Offender
Commitment Act in the amount determined by the court. No such account,
bill, or claim shall be allowed by the county board until the amount
thereof has been determined by the court.
Sec. 12. Section 71-948, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
71-948 A subject or the subject's counsel shall have the right to
employ mental health professionals of his or her choice to independently
evaluate the subject's mental condition and testify for and otherwise
assist the subject in proceedings under the Nebraska Mental Health
Commitment Act or the Sex Offender Commitment Act. If the subject is
indigent, only one such person may be employed except with leave of the
mental health board. Any person so employed by a subject determined by
the board to be indigent, except a subject represented by the public
defender or county conflict counsel as defined in section 1 of this act,
shall apply to the board for expenses reasonably necessary to such
person's effective assistance of the subject and for reasonable fees for
services performed by such person in assisting the subject. The board
shall then fix reasonable fees and expenses, and the county board shall
allow payment to such person in the full amount fixed by the board.
Sec. 13. Original sections 29-3901, 29-3904, 29-3905, 29-3918,
43-273, 71-946, 71-947, and 71-948, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
and sections 29-3903, 29-3922, and 43-272, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, are repealed.
-11-